South Dakota, session 2026, HB1277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-18:
Any existing or newly constructed campground, or a permanent addition,
alteration, or modification to an existing structure in a campground, which requires notice
to the department, as set forth in § 34-18-23, must comply with the National Fire
Protection Association 1194, Standard for Recreational Vehicle Parks and Campgrounds,
2026 Edition.
This section does not apply to a campground owned or operated by this state or a
political subdivision of this state.
Section 2. This Act is effective beginning July 1, 2027.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.